Hawaii, session 2026, SB2274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 329-123.2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. ["§329-123.2  Qualifying patient medical records; inspection and enforcement; authority.  (a) The department may inspect a qualifying patient's medical records held by the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or hospice provider who issued a written certification for the qualifying patient. (b) The department may suspend or revoke the ability to issue a written certification for any physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or hospice provider who refuses inspection of a qualifying patient's medical records by the department pursuant to this section. (c) The department may suspend or revoke the ability to issue a written certification for any physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or hospice provider whose medical records do not comply with the requirements of this chapter."] SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________